Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.71, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 55. new text end new text begin Department of Transportation construction projects. new text end new text begin Purchases by the Department of Transportation of materials, supplies, and equipment, incorporated into the construction, improvement, and maintenance of public highways are exempt. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end